Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1295.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1602 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1602. Purpose and construction of chapter.* * *(c) Federal law.--To the extent that this chapter conflicts with Federal law or regulation, the Federal law or regulation shall prevail. Notice of nonapplicability shall be transmitted by the department to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 2. Section 1603 of Title 75 is amended by adding 123456789101112131415161718192021 definitions to read:§ 1603. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Evidence of lawful immigration status." As defined in 49 CFR 383.5 (relating to definitions).* * *"Nondomiciled CDL" or "nondomiciled CLP." As defined in 49 CFR 383.5.* * *Section 3. Section 1607(a)(3), (6), (7) and (9), (b)(1), (c)(3) and (d)(1) and (5) of Title 75 are amended and subsections (a), (c) and (d) are amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1607. Commercial driver's license qualification standards.(a) Testing.--* * *(3) The department may authorize a person, including an agency of this or another state, an employer, a private institution, association or driver training school, or a department, agency or instrumentality of local government to administer the skills test specified by this section, provided:(i) The test is the same as that which would otherwise be administered by the department.(ii) The third party has entered into an agreement with the department.(iii) The third party administers tests to meet the English proficiency standard under section 1607.1 20260SB1295PN1599 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to English proficiency standard).* * *(6) The department shall provide applicants for commercial driver's licenses with the choice of selecting a knowledge test administered in either a written or an oral format:(i) The department shall administer the knowledge tests in [both the English and Spanish languages] the English language.(ii) An applicant requesting the oral [or Spanish] version of the knowledge test in the English language must schedule for the examination at a testing site authorized by the department.[(iii) The department shall offer alternate testing formats to avoid discrimination against drivers with limited literacy or verbal comprehension skills.](iv) The alternative of an oral version of the knowledge test in the English language shall not be available to persons seeking a hazardous materials endorsement on a commercial driver's license.(v) The use of interpreters shall not be permitted.(7) The department shall accept the results of skills tests administered in other states and sent electronically by the other state, provided that the skills test administered meets Federal testing standards and the individual meets the English proficiency standard under section 1607.1.* * *(8.1) In addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, a person providing false entries on the application for a commercial driver learner's permit or commercial 20260SB1295PN1599 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 driver's license or any documentation required for the permit or license shall be, upon conviction, guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree.(9) [Interpreters shall not be permitted during the administration of the skills test. Neither the commercial driver learner's permit holder nor the test examiner may communicate in a language other than English during the skills test.] The following apply during the administration of the skills test:(i) Interpreters shall not be permitted.(ii) A test examiner shall affirm that the commercial driver learner's permit holder meets the English proficiency standard under section 1607.1.(b) Waiver of test.--The department shall waive the skills test specified in this section for a commercial driver's license applicant:(1) Holding a valid Class 2, 3 or 4 license who meets the requirements of Federal regulations and the English proficiency standard under section 1607.1. If permitted by Federal regulation, the department may waive the written test requirement for a commercial driver's license applicant holding a valid Class 2, 3 or 4 license if the applicant meets the English proficiency standard.* * *(c) Limitations on issuance of license.--* * *(3) A commercial driver's license or commercial driver learner's permit shall not be issued to a person while the person is subject to a disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle or while the person's driver's 20260SB1295PN1599 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license is suspended, revoked or canceled in any state; nor shall a commercial driver's license or commercial driver learner's permit be issued to a person who has a commercial driver's license or commercial driver learner's permit issued by any other state unless the person first surrenders all such licenses and permits, which shall be returned to the issuing state for cancellation.* * *(5) A person must complete entry-level driver training consistent with 49 CFR Pt. 380 Subpt. F (relating to entry-level driver training requirements on and after February 7, 2022) before taking the knowledge test.(d) Commercial driver learner's permit.--(1) The department shall issue a commercial driver learner's permit in accordance with section 1505 (relating to learners' permits) if the individual meets the English proficiency standard under section 1607.1.* * *(5) An applicant for a commercial driver learner's permit must have a valid driver's license or commercial driver's license issued by the department[.] or any other jurisdiction.* * *(6.1) The validity of a commercial driver learner's permit and commercial driver's license, which is also a nondomiciled CLP and nondomiciled CDL, shall not exceed the official expiration date of a person's authorized stay in the United States or expiration date of evidence of lawful immigration status.* * *20260SB1295PN1599 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1607.1. English proficiency standard.(a) Requirement.--To operate a commercial motor vehicle in this Commonwealth, an individual must meet the English proficiency standard under subsection (b).(b) Standard defined.--(1) An individual can read and speak the English language sufficiently to:(i) Converse with the general public.(ii) Understand highway traffic signs and signals in the English language.(iii) Respond to official inquiries.(iv) Make entries on reports and records.(2) The applicability of an individual's qualification to speak in the English language shall not apply to hearing- impaired drivers in accordance with Federal regulation.(c) Offense defined.--An individual who operates a commercial motor vehicle and fails to meet the English proficiency standard under subsection (b) commits a summary offense and, upon conviction, shall be subject to:(1) A fine of $500 for a first offense and a disqualification under section 1611 (relating to disqualification).(2) A fine of $1,000 for a second or subsequent offense and a disqualification under section 1611.(d) Operating prohibition.--(1) A driver found to be in violation of this section shall be prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle within this Commonwealth.(2) If the commercial motor vehicle is owned by an 20260SB1295PN1599 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employer, the employer shall be notified of the location of the commercial motor vehicle involved in a violation.(3) If the vehicle is not towed, the employer may only take possession following presentation of a driver who meets the requirements of this chapter.(4) In coordination with the employer, the cargo owner may be notified and allowed to arrange for the transfer of the cargo to another vehicle with a driver properly licensed to operate the commercial motor vehicle, if applicable.(e) Seizure of registration plate.--A person authorized to enforce the provisions of this chapter shall seize the registration plate and impound the commercial motor vehicle if the individual is in violation of this section and the owner of the vehicle is the driver. The individual may petition the department for the return of the registration plate and pay a processing fee of $500.(f) Additional penalties.--(1) An individual convicted under subsection (c) and found to be operating a commercial motor vehicle in this Commonwealth commits a misdemeanor.(2) An individual operating a commercial motor vehicle in this Commonwealth in violation of this section who causes serious bodily injury or death commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(g) Employer penalty.--An employer whose driver is convicted under this section shall be subject to a fine of $3,000 for each violation.(h) Contractor penalty.--A prime contractor whose subcontractor is a driver and convicted under this section shall be subject to a fine of $3,000 for each violation.20260SB1295PN1599 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. Section 1608 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 1608. [Nonresident] Nondomiciled CDL and CLP.[(a) Issuance of nonresident CDL.--The department may issue a nonresident CDL to a resident of a foreign jurisdiction. The following apply:(1) The word "nondomiciled" shall appear on the face of the nonresident CDL.(2) An applicant shall surrender any nonresident CDL issued by another state.(3) Prior to issuing a nonresident CDL, the department shall establish the practical capability of revoking, suspending or canceling the nonresident CDL and disqualifying the commercial motor vehicle driving privilege of that person.(b) Other provisions applicable.--All provisions of this chapter applicable to the commercial driver's license for a resident of this Commonwealth, except the residency requirement, and all provisions of this title applicable to drivers' licenses shall be applicable to a nonresident CDL.(c) Waiver of testing requirement.--The department may issue a nonresident CDL to a resident of a foreign jurisdiction without requiring additional testing if the driver possesses a valid CDL issued by another state or by the foreign jurisdiction of the driver and the United States Secretary of Transportation has determined that the commercial motor vehicle testing and licensing standards in the foreign jurisdiction meet the testing standards established in Federal regulations.](a) Issuance of nondomiciled CDL and CLP.--The department may issue a nondomiciled CDL and nondomiciled CLP to a resident of a foreign jurisdiction. The following apply:20260SB1295PN1599 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) To be eligible for a nondomiciled CDL and nondomiciled CLP, an applicant domiciled in a foreign jurisdiction shall:(i) Have lawful immigration status in the United States.(ii) Provide evidence of lawful immigration status.(2) The word "nondomiciled" shall appear on the face of the nondomiciled CDL and nondomiciled CLP.(3) An applicant shall immediately surrender any nondomiciled CDL or nondomiciled CLP issued by another state to the department.(4) Prior to issuing a nondomiciled CDL or nondomiciled CLP , the individual must apply for a commercial driver's license under section 1609 (relating to application for commercial driver's license) or commercial driver learner's permit under section 1607(d) (relating to commercial driver's license qualification standards) as determined by the department, provided that the individual meets the English proficiency standard under section 1607.1 (relating to English proficiency standard).(5) The department may revoke, suspend or cancel the nondomiciled CDL or nondomiciled CLP and disqualify the commercial motor vehicle driving privilege of a person.(6) Under no circumstance shall the department issue a nondomiciled CDL and nondomiciled CLP with "no name given."(7) Prior to issuing, transferring, renewing or upgrading a nondomiciled CLP or nondomiciled CDL, the department shall comply with the document verification and retention requirements in 49 CFR 383.73 (relating to state procedures).20260SB1295PN1599 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) Prior to issuing, transferring, renewing or upgrading a nondomiciled CLP or nondomiciled CDL, the department shall query the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements system to review the evidence of lawful immigration status of an applicant.(9) If, after issuing, transferring, renewing or upgrading a nondomiciled CLP or nondomiciled CDL, the department receives information from the Federal Government that the applicant no longer has lawful immigration status in the United States, the department shall initiate established department procedures for downgrading the nondomiciled CLP or nondomiciled CDL.(10) The department shall require every nondomiciled CLP or nondomiciled CDL issuance, transfer, renewal or upgrade be conducted in-person only and may not permit issuance, transfer, renewal or upgrade by mail or electronic means(11) The department shall ensure the period of validity of the nondomiciled CDL and nondomiciled CLP does not exceed the official expiration date of the applicant's authorized stay in the United States or expiration date on the applicant's documentation or one year, whichever is sooner. The department may not issue a nondomiciled CDL and nondomiciled CLP with a period of validity longer than one year.(12) The department may not issue a nondomiciled CDL or nondomiciled CLP that is a REAL ID.(b) Other provisions applicable.--All provisions of this chapter applicable to the commercial driver's license for a resident of this Commonwealth, except the residency requirement unless the evidence of lawful immigration status expires, and 20260SB1295PN1599 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 all provisions of this title applicable to drivers' licenses shall be applicable to a nondomiciled CDL or nondomiciled CLP, unless the individual fails to meet the English proficiency standard.(c) Waiver of testing requirement.--The department may issue a nondomiciled CDL and nondomiciled CLP to a resident of a foreign jurisdiction without requiring additional testing if the United States Secretary of Transportation has determined that the commercial motor vehicle testing and licensing standards in the foreign jurisdiction meet the testing standards established in Federal regulations, unless the individual fails to meet the English proficiency standard.Section 6. Section 1609(a) of Title 75 is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 1609. Application for commercial driver's license.(a) Contents of application.--The application for a commercial driver's license or commercial driver learner's permit shall include the following:* * *(6.1) Evidence of lawful immigration status. The department shall reject any application without evidence of lawful immigration status.(6.2) Self-certification of the applicant's ability to meet the English proficiency standard.* * *Section 7. Section 1611(a) and (j) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 1611. Disqualification.(a) First violation of certain offenses.--Upon receipt of a report of conviction, the department shall, in addition to any 20260SB1295PN1599 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other penalties imposed under this title, disqualify any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle or school vehicle for a period of one year for the first violation of:(1) section 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance) or former section 3731, where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred;(2) section 3742 (relating to accidents involving death or personal injury), where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred;(3) section 3743 (relating to accidents involving damage to attended vehicle or property), where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred;(4) section 3745 (relating to accidents involving damage to unattended vehicle or property), where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred;(5) any felony in the commission of which a court determines a motor vehicle was essentially involved and where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred, except as described in subsection (e);(6) section 1606(c) (relating to requirement for commercial driver's license); [or](7) any offense wherein the person caused the death of a person as a result of a motor vehicle accident through the negligent operation of a commercial motor vehicle, including, but not limited to, a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 2504 (relating to involuntary manslaughter) or a violation of section 3732 (relating to homicide by vehicle)[.]; or(8) section 1607.1 (relating to English proficiency standard).20260SB1295PN1599 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(j) Updating driving record.--After disqualifying, suspending, revoking, recalling or canceling a commercial driving privilege, the department shall update its records to reflect that action. After disqualifying, suspending, revoking, recalling or canceling a commercial driving privilege issued by another state, the department shall notify the licensing authority of the state which issued the commercial driver's license or [nonresident commercial driver's license] nondomiciled CDL and nondomiciled CLP. In addition to any other records required or authorized to be kept by the department, the department shall file or make suitable notation in its records thereof all reports of the conviction of any violation, in any motor vehicle, of a State or local traffic control law, except a parking violation, and also for any other report of conviction or report of test refusal that results in disqualification pursuant to this chapter, of a person who was a commercial driver at the time of the violation that are received by the department from any court or administrative body of the Commonwealth, another state or the Federal Government. Such reports or suitable notations may be stored and admitted into evidence by the department as provided in section 1516(b) (relating to department records). Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no record maintained by the department in accordance with the provisions of this subsection may be expunged by order of court.* * *Section 8. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1623. Annual report.The department shall provide the chairperson and minority 20260SB1295PN1599 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives with an annual report that mirrors the Annual Program Review conducted by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration.Section 9. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following provisions shall take effect immediately:The amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1607(a)(6).This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1295PN1599 - 14 - 123456789101112